South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4772.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-339.  (A) The High School League or other similar interscholastic athletics sanctioning body may not schedule an athletic event for a high school to occur on the same day on which the school is holding its: (1) graduation ceremony; or (2) prom or other similar formal dance held by the school near the end of the academic year. (B) A decision by the High School League or other similar interscholastic athletics sanctioning body made in violation of subsection (A) is void and the outcome or forfeiture of any athletic competition scheduled in violation of this section is void. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----